Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6182.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-17. Eligibility for low- and moderate-income housing – Tiverton.
(a) Any person who applies to rent or purchase a residence located in the town of Tiverton
which qualifies as low- or moderate-income housing, shall require proof of Rhode Island residency
or employment by a local, state or federal entity.
(b) For purposes of this section, local entity shall mean a municipality within the State of
Rhode Island and a state entity shall mean the State of Rhode Island.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002695
========